Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1

General Provisions

63-1-101. Powers and duties.

The division of health related boards, in the department of health, is responsible for all administrative, fiscal, inspectional, clerical and secretarial functions of the health related boards under § 68-1-101.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.1 (Williams, § 6917.18); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 45; 1959, ch. 9, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-101; Acts 1984, ch. 937, §§ 3, 54; T.C.A., § 63-1-102.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-101 was transferred to § 63-1-119 in 1986.

Cross-References. Revocation or denial of professional licenses for child support enforcement, title 36, ch. 5, part 7.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

The Standard of Care: The Road Not Taken-Using County Size to Determine the Standard of Care, 43 U. Mem. L. Rev. 767 (2013).

Attorney General Opinions. Regulation of the practice of acupuncture, OAG 95-027, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (4/4/95).

Neither the emergency services board nor the division of health related boards have authority to issue administrative subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents prior to the commencement of an administrative action, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

63-1-102. Chapter definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Division” means the division of health related boards in the department of health as created by § 68-1-101;

“Health care prescriber” means a:

Physician licensed under chapter 6 or 9 of this title;

Dentist licensed under chapter 5 of this title;

Nurse licensed under chapter 7 of this title;

Podiatrist licensed under chapter 3 of this title;

Optometrist licensed under chapter 8 of this title; and

Physician assistant licensed under chapter 19 of this title;

“Practice of the healing arts” means offering or undertaking to diagnose, treat, operate on or prescribe for any human pain, injury, disease, deformity or physical or mental condition. The practice of acupuncture is hereby declared to be included within the definition of “practice of the healing arts” as defined by this section; and

“Title” means the recognized professional abbreviation or professional designation immediately following or immediately below the person's name that indicates the professional license or certification held by such person.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 2; 1947, ch. 107, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.2 (Williams, § 6917.19); Acts 1955, ch. 160, § 1; 1969, ch. 338, § 1; 1973, ch. 350, § 1; 1973, ch. 393, § 1; 1975, ch. 355, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 851, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-102; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 55; T.C.A., § 63-1-103; Acts 2005, ch. 467, § 3; 2014, ch. 983, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 983, § 5 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

63-1-103. Application for licenses.

Each application for a license filed with the division shall be on forms prescribed by the division or via online application and shall be accompanied by a fee as set by the division.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 4; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.4 (Williams, § 6917.21); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-108; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 61; T.C.A., § 63-1-109; Acts 1990, ch. 1026, § 27; 2014, ch. 949, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-103 was transferred to §§ 63-1-102 and 63-1-104(c) in 1986.

63-1-104. Issuance of licenses.

Upon proper direction by the appropriate licensing board, the division shall forthwith issue to the applicant a license of a size and artistic design to be determined by the board.

Every such license issued by the division shall be dated and be numbered in the order of issuance and shall be signed by the executive officer and by the members of the state board charged with the duty by law of issuing the preliminary certificates.

No license, examination or certification shall be denied to any person for practice of any of the healing arts under this title because such person is not a citizen of the United States, if such person is legally entitled to live within the United States.

Any board, committee, council, or agency created pursuant to this title or title 68 that regulates health professionals shall have the authority to do the following at its discretion:

Issue a limited license of temporary duration to applicants who have been out of clinical practice or inactive in their practice for an extended period of time, or who have been or are at the time of their application engaged exclusively in administrative practice; provided, that the applicant meets all other requirements for licensure;

Restrict the scope of practice under such limited license as deemed appropriate;

Restrict the duration of such limited license as deemed appropriate;

Condition the granting of a full license upon an applicant's completion of any educational measures or supervised practice requirements deemed necessary and appropriate to ensure the applicant's competency to practice the profession for which a license is sought.

At the conclusion of the duration of a limited license granted pursuant to subsection (d), an applicant may be eligible for full licensure if the applicant has completed the educational measures or supervised practice requirements the board, committee, council, or agency deemed necessary and appropriate to ensure the applicant's competency to practice. The board, committee, council, or agency may grant a full license before the conclusion of a limited license's duration if an applicant has completed the specified educational measures or practice requirements prior to the expiration of the limited license.

A board, committee, council, or agency may promulgate rules establishing other conditions or requirements with respect to the issuance of limited licenses pursuant to this section in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The recipient of a limited license pursuant to this section may engage in the full scope of practice of the applicable profession subject to any limitations or restrictions imposed by the board, committee, council, or agency.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.4 (Williams, § 6917.21); Acts 1969, ch. 338, § 1; 1980, ch. 851, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-109; Acts 1975, ch. 355, § 1; 1984, ch. 937, § 62; T.C.A., §§ 63-1-103, 63-1-110; Acts 2017, ch. 240, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-104 (Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.3 (Williams, § 6917.20); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 2; 1973, ch. 393, § 2; 1974, ch. 495, § 6; 1976, ch. 650, § 16; 1980, ch. 851, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-103, concerning certificates of fitness for licensing and recommendations for certifying nurse practitioners, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 56.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (d)-(g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 240, § 6. May 2, 2017.

63-1-105. Signing of licenses.

Before issuing any license as provided in this chapter, the division shall cause the license to be signed by the members of the board of the particular branch of the healing arts in which the holder thereof is being licensed.

Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 1 (Williams, § 6917.19); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-110; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 63; T.C.A., § 63-1-111.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-105 was transferred to § 63-1-118 in 1986.

63-1-106. Duplicate licenses — Change of name — Fee.

A licensee of any branch of the healing arts whose license has been lost or destroyed may make application to the board of that particular branch of the healing arts for a new license. Such application shall be accompanied by an affidavit setting out the facts concerning the loss or destruction of the license.

Any licensee of any branch of the healing arts whose name is changed by marriage or court order may surrender that licensee's license and apply to the board of that particular branch of the healing arts for a new license.

The fee for such new license shall be set by the board issuing such certificate.

Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 2 (Williams, § 6917.20); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-105; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 58; 1990, ch. 1026, § 28.

63-1-107. License renewals.

Every person licensed to practice any branch of the healing arts in this state shall apply to the division for a certificate of registration. Notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months and expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board determines that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in subdivision (a)(1).

All new licenses issued by the division, upon application and payment of the registration fee provided in this subsection (b), shall be registered by the division at the time of issuance and a certificate of registration shall be issued to the licensee.

Each application shall be made on a form to be furnished by the division. Such application shall give the applicant's name in full, the applicant's address, the date and number of the license issued to such applicant for the practice of the healing arts or any branch thereof, and such other facts as tend to identify the applicant and the applicant's license as the division deems necessary.

Each applicant for registration shall submit with the application a fee as set annually by the division.

When any licensee fails to register and pay the annual registration fee within sixty (60) days after the registration becomes due as provided in this section, the license of such person shall be automatically revoked at the expiration of sixty (60) days after the registration was required, without further notice or hearing.

Any person whose license is automatically revoked as provided in subsection (c) may make application in writing to the appropriate licensing board for the reinstatement of such license; and, upon good cause being shown, the division and the board in their discretion may reinstate such license upon the payment of the renewal fee as set by the board as well as a late renewal fee set by the board, which may not exceed twice the renewal fee.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.5 (Williams, § 6917.22); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 4; 1973, ch. 166, § 1; 1975, ch. 355, § 3; 1976, ch. 406, § 1; 1976, ch. 566, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-113; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 66; T.C.A., § 63-1-114; Acts 1989, ch. 360, §§ 15, 16; 1990, ch. 1026, §§ 29, 30; 2010, ch. 1043, § 1; 2016, ch. 763, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-107 (Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.3 (Williams, § 6917.20); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-106), concerning failure of branch boards to comply, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 59.

63-1-108. Certificate of registration — Change of address of registrant — Service of process.

Upon due application by a licensee of the division and upon the payment of fees required to be paid by this chapter, the division shall issue to such applicant a certificate of registration signed by the executive officer of the division, which certificate shall recite that such person is duly registered for the year specified.

Such certificate of registration shall contain the name of the person to whom it is issued, the address of the person, which shall be the address of the licensee deemed sufficient for purposes of service of process, the branch of the healing arts in which the person is licensed to practice, the date and number of the license and such other information as the division deems advisable.

If any registrant changes address during the year for which any certificate of registration has been issued by the division, such registrant, within thirty (30) days thereafter, shall notify the division of such change, whereupon the division shall issue to such registrant, without additional fee, a duplicate registration certificate for such new location.

For the purpose of effecting service of process upon a licensee, the division may notify the licensee by certified mail, return receipt requested, at the address on file with the division.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 6; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.6 (Williams, § 6917.23); Acts 1975, ch. 355, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-114; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 67; T.C.A., § 63-1-115; Acts 1990, ch. 1026, § 32.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-108 (Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.3 (Williams, § 6917.20); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-107) concerning powers of examining boards, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 60.

63-1-109. Display of license or certificate of registration — Terminology used in signs and written material.

Every person licensed or registered to practice one of the healing arts, or any branch thereof, as delineated in this section shall keep an original or copy of the person's license or certificate of registration displayed in the office or place in which the person practices, in a conspicuous place, and shall place and keep placed in a conspicuous place at the entrance of the person's office, a sign in intelligible lettering and not less than one inch (1") in height, containing the name of such person immediately followed by the recognized abbreviation indicating the professional degree, if any, held by such person, and containing immediately below the person's name, in equal size lettering, the word or words:

“Chiropractor,” “chiropractic physician” or “doctor of chiropractic” for practitioners of chiropractic;

“Dentist,” “doctor of dental surgery” or “doctor of dental medicine” for practitioners of dentistry;

“Medical doctor,” “physician,” “medical doctor and surgeon,” “medicine” or “surgeon,” as applicable, for practitioners of medicine and surgery;

“Optometrist,” “doctor of optometry” or “optometric physician” for practitioners of optometry;

“Osteopathic physician,” “osteopathic physician and surgeon,” “doctor of osteopathic medicine” or “doctor of osteopathy” for practitioners of osteopathy;

“Podiatrist,” “podiatric physician,” “doctor of podiatry,” “doctor of podiatric medicine” or “doctor of podiatric medicine and surgery” for practitioners of podiatry;

“Advanced practice registered nurse,” “nurse practitioner,” “nurse anesthetist,” “nurse midwife” or “clinical nurse specialist,” as applicable, for those practicing advanced practice nursing;

“Physician assistant” or “orthopedic physician assistant,” as applicable, for those licensed as a physician assistant;

“Psychologist” or “doctor of psychology” for practitioners of psychology;

“Acupuncturist” for practitioners of acupuncture; and

“Certified professional midwife” for those practitioners of midwifery.

Any recognized specialist in any branch of the healing arts, which special field is recognized or approved by the appropriate board licensing that profession, may substitute the specialist designation for the words indicated in subsection (a).

A healthcare practitioner listed in subsection (a) shall also affirmatively communicate the practitioner's specific licensure, as defined in this section by one (1) of the following methods:

The healthcare practitioner shall wear a photo identification name tag during all patient encounters that shall include a recent photograph of the licensee, the licensee's full name, and the type of license. The name tag shall be of sufficient size and be worn in a conspicuous manner so as to be visible and apparent; or

After January 1, 2012, the healthcare practitioner shall communicate to a patient the practitioner's full name and type of license in writing at the patient's initial office visit.

For purposes of subsection (c), the type of license shall enunciate one (1) or more of the words listed in subsection (a).

A healthcare practitioner who practices in more than one (1) office shall be required to comply with the requirements in each practice setting.

A healthcare practitioner who does not have an office setting can satisfy the requirements of this section by meeting the conditions set forth in subsection (c).

Healthcare practitioners working in facilities licensed pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, or working in facilities licensed pursuant to title 33, chapter 2, are not subject to the requirements of this section.

Healthcare practitioners working in no-patient care settings and who have no direct patient care interactions are not subject to the requirements of this section.

Any healthcare practitioner who violates this section is guilty of unprofessional conduct and shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the appropriate licensure provisions governing the respective healthcare practitioner. A violation of this section shall not create a private right of action by a patient.

Notwithstanding the imposition of any other penalty, the board which has licensed a particular healthcare practitioner may seek injunctive or other relief as appropriate against that practitioner or any entity for a violation of this section.

A healthcare practitioner, who provides information regarding healthcare services on an internet website that is directly controlled or administered by the healthcare practitioner or the practitioner's agent, shall prominently display on the internet website the practitioner's full name and type of license using one (1) or more of the words listed in subsection (a).

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.8 (Williams, § 6917.25); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-117; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 70; T.C.A., § 63-1-118; Acts 1994, ch. 901, § 5; 2005, ch. 467, § 1; 2011, ch. 75, § 1; 2016, ch. 980, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 163, § 8 provided that nothing in the act, which amended § 63-1-502, authorizes a chiropractic physician to use a title other than the titles recognized in subdivision (a)(1).

63-1-110. Licensees in armed forces or public health service.

Any person licensed to practice a healing art or any branch thereof in this state who is an officer in the commissioned medical corps of the army, the navy, the air force or the public health service of the United States shall not be required to register as provided in this chapter.

When such person resigns or is honorably discharged from one of the services mentioned in subsection (a) and engages in the practice of a healing art or any branch thereof in this state, such person shall register with the appropriate board licensing that profession.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 690.7 (Williams, § 6917.24); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-116; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 69; T.C.A., § 63-1-117.

63-1-111. Retirement.

Any person licensed to practice the healing arts or any branch thereof in this state who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice shall not be required to register as required by this chapter.

Such person shall file with the division an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the division, which affidavit shall state the date on which the person retired from such practice and such other facts as shall tend to verify such retirement as the division shall deem necessary.

Any such person who thereafter reengages in the practice of the healing arts or any branch thereof shall register with the division as provided by this chapter.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.7 (Williams, § 6917.24); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-115; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 68; T.C.A., § 63-1-116.

63-1-112. License and registration fees.

No fee for the issuance of licenses to practice the healing arts or any branch thereof shall be collected except by the appropriate board licensing that profession.

All fees due the boards regulating the various branches of the healing arts shall be collected by the division.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.14 (Williams, § 6917.31); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-119; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 71; T.C.A., § 63-1-119; Acts 2010, ch. 1043, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-112 (Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.4 (Williams, § 6917.21); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-111), concerning denial of licenses, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 64.

63-1-113. Disbursement of fines and penalties — Operating expenses.

All fines and penalties for offenses for the violation of this chapter shall be paid over to the division and shall become a part of the receipts of the division. All money received by the division shall be paid into the state treasury and become a part of the general fund of the state.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall make such allotments out of the general fund as the commissioner may deem proper for the necessary expenses of all professional boards for which fees are collected by the division, and no expenditure shall be made by the division unless and until such allotment has been made by the commissioner. Such allotments shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of the state.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 13; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.13 (Williams, § 6917.30); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-120; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 72; T.C.A., § 63-1-120.

63-1-114. Directory of licensees.

The division shall publish a directory listing all persons licensed to practice any branch of the healing arts in Tennessee.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.3 (Williams, § 6917.20); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 2; 1972, ch. 834, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-112; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 65; T.C.A., § 63-1-113; Acts 1990, ch. 1024, § 32; 1990, ch. 1026, § 1; 2010, ch. 1043, § 3.

63-1-115. Employment of administrative and enforcement personnel.

The division is authorized to employ investigators, inspectors or agents or to use any other means necessary to bring about and maintain a rigid administration and enforcement of this chapter and all laws regulating the practice of the healing arts and the various branches thereof within this state.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.13 (Williams, § 6917.30); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-127; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 78; T.C.A., § 63-1-127.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. L. Rev. 477.

63-1-116. Criminal background checks for health care providers.

Each board, council, committee or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title or title 68 that is attached to the department is authorized to promulgate all rules and regulations necessary for obtaining criminal background information from applicants prior to the issuance of any licenses, certificates, registrations or other authorizations required to practice any of the health related professions regulated by that board, council, committee or other governmental entity. The respective board, council, committee or other governmental entity may utilize, either individually or in combination, any of the following methods in furtherance of the objectives of this section:

Query the Tennessee bureau of investigation's (TBI) Tennessee criminal history records system for any or all of the following information:

Tennessee criminal history records;

Tennessee repository for apprehension of persons (TRAP);

State of Tennessee orders of protection files (STOP); and

Criminal history records of the federal government and other states to which TBI may have access. Criminal history records of the federal bureau of investigation may be obtained for the reasons listed in this subsection (a), only if fingerprints are obtained and submitted through the TBI;

Require applicants to provide any and all information and investigative records to the board, the division or its agent or to any agency that contracts with the state that is necessary for the purpose of verifying whether the applicant has been convicted of a crime;

Require applicants to supply a fingerprint sample and submit to a criminal history records check to be conducted by the TBI, other law enforcement agency or any legally authorized entity; and

Require applicants to supply any sample or release any information required for a criminal background investigation by a professional background screening organization or criminal background check service or registry.

All costs associated with the required criminal background checks shall be paid by the applicant. Payments of costs required to be made to the TBI shall be made in accordance with §§ 38-6-103 and 38-6-109.

Any board, council, or committee or other governmental entity that denies an application or restricts or conditions any authorization to practice based upon information provided to it under this section shall be immune from suit by or on behalf of that applicant for the denial, restriction or condition.

Initial rules promulgated pursuant to this section may be promulgated as emergency rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2007, ch. 182, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-116 (Acts 1975, ch. 355, § 7; 1980, ch. 605, §§ 2, 5; T.C.A., § 63-128; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 79; T.C.A., § 63-1-128), concerning advertising, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 467, § 2, effective July 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

63-1-117. Conditions for making medical records available for inspection and copying — No application to records statutorily privileged — Immunity from liability — Compelling production of medical records — Disciplinary action — Confidentiality of disciplinary proceedings — Access to records during public health threat.

Notwithstanding §§ 63-2-101(b), 68-11-1502 and 68-11-1503, and regardless of any express or implied contracts, agreements or covenants of confidentiality based upon those sections, health care providers shall make their medical records available for inspection and copying by the department of health or its representatives, designees or employees based on the following conditions:

Upon the presentation of a written authorization for release signed by the patient or the patient's legal representative; or

Upon a written request made by the department of health investigators, inspectors or surveyors who are performing authorized investigations, inspections or surveys of facilities or individuals licensed pursuant to this title or title 68 based on a complaint filed with the department or an inspection or survey required by state or federal law. The written request shall contain the nature of the violation, the applicable laws and rules that may have been violated and the specific date by which production of the records is required. The written request shall be made in good faith and shall be related to the complaint, inspection or survey.

This section shall not apply to records that are made statutorily privileged, which shall require for their production a release that specifically identifies the privilege, contains a statement that the privilege is waived and that is signed by the patient or the patient's legal representative.

Any health care provider or representative of any health care provider who furnishes records to a duly authorized representative, designee or employee of the department of health shall be immune from liability to any patient, individual or organization for furnishing such information, data, reports or records or for damages resulting from any decision, opinion, action and proceedings rendered, entered or acted upon by the department of health, if the information or other records or documents provided were provided or created in good faith and without malice and on the basis of facts reasonably known or reasonably believed to exist.

In the event that a health care provider does not comply with the written request for medical records issued in compliance with subdivision (a)(2), the state may file a petition in the chancery court of Davidson County to compel production of the medical records within fifteen (15) days following the date specified for the production of the medical records contained in the written request.

A health care provider's willful disregard of the request for medical records pursuant to this section is grounds for disciplinary action by the licensing board that regulates the health care provider.

The following materials, documents, and other matters related to, or compiled or created pursuant to, an investigation conducted by or on behalf of the department are confidential and not a public record or subject to subpoena, except for subpoenas from law enforcement agencies, before formal disciplinary charges are filed against the provider:

Allegations against the health care provider;

Complainant's identifying information;

Identifying information of a witness who requests anonymity;

Patient's identifying information;

Patient's medical record; and

Any report or documents prepared by or on behalf of the department as a part of an investigation.

After the filing of formal disciplinary charges against the provider, only the materials and documents upon which the charges are based may be disclosed as a public record, but not the complainant's identifying information, identifying information of a witness who requests anonymity, patient's identifying information, patient's medical record or investigator's report.

Department annual health care facility and pharmacy survey inspection reports shall be available to the public pursuant to subsections (f) and (g).

Pursuant to § 68-1-104, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, upon request, shall obtain access to records maintained by any facility, entity, or individual licensed under this title. Access shall be given in the most efficient and expedient means possible, including remote electronic access, to facilitate investigations and inquiries while responding to an immediate threat to the public health, welfare, or general good. Electronic access shall be limited to the minimum necessary for the duration of the outbreak, event, or time in which the public health is under immediate threat as determined by the commissioner.

This section does not modify or limit the prehearing discovery provisions set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

As used in this section:

“Health care provider” means health care professionals, establishments or facilities licensed, registered, certified or permitted pursuant to this title or title 68 and regulated either under the authority of the department of health or any agency, board, council or committee attached to the department; and

“Medical record” means any and all documents maintained by a health care provider relating to a patient's diagnosis, care and treatment, including, but not limited to, notes, reports, memos, emails, facsimile transmissions, laboratory tests, billing documents and medication orders.

The commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 120, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1-130; Acts 2003, ch. 281, § 1; 2004, ch. 575, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 118, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 188, § 1; 2014, ch. 949, § 2; 2015, ch. 154, § 1; 2017, ch. 240, § 3; 2019, ch. 447, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (f), substituted “, and other matters related to, or compiled or created pursuant to, an investigation conducted by or on behalf of the department shall be confidential and shall not be a public record or subject to subpoena” for “and other matters related to, compiled or created pursuant to an investigation, conducted by or on behalf of the department shall not be a public record” in the introductory language, and inserted “or documents” in (6).

The 2019 amendment, in (f), substituted “are” for “shall be”, substituted “and not a public” for “and shall not be a public”, and inserted “, except for subpoenas from law enforcement agencies,”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 240, § 6. May 2, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 447, § 2. May 22, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. Information obtained pursuant to an administrative/investigative subpoena is confidential pending the introduction of the information at the administrative hearing to the extent that such information is obtained during an investigation by the division of health related boards or the board of medical examiners, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

63-1-118. Certification of fitness for license in other state.

A licensee of any branch of the healing arts who seeks to be licensed in another state by reciprocity on the basis of the licensee's Tennessee license shall have the application for the license certified by the board of the particular branch of the healing arts in which the licensee is licensed.

The fee for this certificate shall be set by and paid to the board of the particular branch of the healing arts in which the applicant is licensed.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.3 (Williams, § 6917.20); Acts 1953, ch. 113, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-104; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 57; T.C.A., § 63-1-105; Acts 1990, ch. 1026, § 31.

63-1-119. Effect of chapter on other law.

No provision of this chapter shall be construed as repealing any other law with reference to the requirements regulating the practice of the healing arts or any branch thereof, except insofar as the same may conflict with this chapter.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.9 (Williams, § 6917.26); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-118; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 53; T.C.A., § 63-1-101.

63-1-120.
Denial, withholding, suspending, limiting or restricting licensure, certification, permit, or authorization or otherwise disciplining holder of license, certificate, permit, or authorization — Disciplinary actions.

With respect to any person required to be licensed, permitted, certified or authorized by any board, council, committee, agency, or regulatory program created pursuant to chapters 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 16, 17, 18, 19, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, and 31 of this title and to title 68, chapter 140 attached to the division of health related boards, such board, council, committee or agency may:

Deny an application for licensure, certification, permit or authorization;

Permanently withhold issuance of licensure, certification, permit or authorization;

Suspend, limit or restrict previously issued licensure, certification, permit or authorization; or

Otherwise discipline a holder of a license, certificate, permit or authorization, if the applicant, licensee or certificate or permit holder has been disciplined by another state of the United States for any acts or omissions that would constitute grounds for discipline of a person licensed, certified, permitted or authorized in this state.

A certified copy of the initial order, final order or other equivalent document memorializing the disciplinary action from the disciplining state shall constitute prima facie evidence of a violation of this section and shall be sufficient grounds upon which to deny, restrict or condition the license, permit or certificate renewal or application, and/or otherwise to discipline a licensee licensed in this state.

In disciplinary actions against individuals holding a license, certificate, permit or authorization in this state at the time of a disciplinary action in another reporting state, in the absence of justifying evidence to the contrary, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the sanction proposed in any such proceeding will be comparable to that in the reporting state; however, no such presumption shall exist for those who are applying for licensure, certification, permit or authorization in this state during or after the time the disciplinary action in the other state is pending or has become final. If a board, council, committee, agency, or regulatory program created pursuant to chapters 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 16, 17, 18, 19, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, and 31 of this title or title 68, chapter 140 denies, restricts or conditions a licensure, certification, permit or authorization based on a disciplinary action in another state, the applicant shall, upon written request, filed within thirty (30) days of the date of the action on the application, be entitled to a contested case hearing.

Acts 1947, ch. 9, § 11; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 6907.11 (Williams, § 6917.28); Acts 1955, ch. 57, § 1; 1975, ch. 355, §§ 5, 6; 1980, ch. 605, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 63-123; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 75; T.C.A., § 63-1-123; Acts 2001, ch. 286, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 1043, § 4; 2020, ch. 594, § 5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “board, council, committee, agency, or regulatory program created pursuant to chapters 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 16, 17, 18, 19, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, and 31” for “board, council, committee or agency created pursuant to chapters 4, 5, 7, 9, 11 and 12” in the introductory paragraph of (a)(1) and the second sentence of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 594, § 9. March 20, 2020.

Cross-References. Ambulatory surgical care centers terminating pregnancies, licensing, § 68-11-223.

Parental consent for abortions by minors, title 37, ch. 10, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 15 Tenn. Juris., Injunctions, § 15.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

Attorney General Opinions. A proposed amendment to T.C.A. § 63-1-120, which would add a new subdivision regarding health care professionals who fail to comply either with any federal or state direct or guaranteed loan or with service requirements of any federal or state loan allowing forgiveness of debt in exchange for a period of service, would not violate the equal protection clauses of the United States or Tennessee constitutions, OAG 02-059, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 64 (5/6/02).